apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="h/ang__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ang</l>                 <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ang</l>                 <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>angs</l>                <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anged</l>               <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ung</l>                 <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anged</l>               <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ung</l>                 <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anging</l>              <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hear__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hew__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hid/e__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>e</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>e</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>es</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>den</l>                 <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="w/eave__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>eave</l>                <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eave</l>                <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eaves</l>               <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ove</l>                 <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oven</l>                <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eaving</l>              <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="le/ad__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ad</l>                  <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ad</l>                  <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ads</l>                 <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ading</l>               <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="le/ave__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ave</l>                 <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ave</l>                 <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aves</l>                <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ft</l>                  <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ft</l>                  <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aving</l>               <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ie__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ie</l>                  <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ie</l>                  <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ies</l>                 <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ay</l>                  <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ain</l>                 <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ying</l>                <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lo/se__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>se</l>                  <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>se</l>                  <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ses</l>                 <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>st</l>                  <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>st</l>                  <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>sing</l>                <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ma/ke__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ke</l>                  <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ke</l>                  <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>kes</l>                 <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>de</l>                  <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>de</l>                  <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>king</l>                <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="me/et__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>et</l>                  <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>et</l>                  <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ets</l>                 <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>t</l>                   <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>t</l>                   <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eting</l>               <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="hang">                 <i>h</i><par n="h/ang__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hear">                 <i>hear</i><par n="hear__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hide">                 <i>hid</i><par n="hid/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="interweave">           <i>interw</i><par n="w/eave__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lead">                 <i>le</i><par n="le/ad__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="leave">                <i>le</i><par n="le/ave__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lose">                 <i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="make">                 <i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="make a mistake"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>mistake</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>mistake</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="meet">                 <i>me</i><par n="me/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sew">                  <i>sew</i><par n="hew__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="show">                 <i>show</i><par n="hew__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="show up">              <i>show</i><par n="hew__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
